New York, session 2025-2026, A3492.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (c) of section 1174 of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as amended by chapter 433 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 (c) Every person convicted of a violation of subdivision (a) of this 5 section shall: for a first conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of 6 not less than [two] three hundred fifty dollars nor more than [four] 7 five hundred dollars or by imprisonment for not more than thirty days or 8 by both such fine and imprisonment; for a conviction of a second 9 violation, both of which were committed within a period of three years, 10 such person shall be punished by a fine of not less than [six] five 11 hundred dollars nor more than [seven hundred fifty] eight hundred 12 dollars or by imprisonment for not more than one hundred eighty days or 13 by both such fine and imprisonment; upon a conviction of a third or 14 subsequent violation, all of which were committed within a period of 15 three years, such person shall be punished by a fine of not less than 16 [seven hundred fifty] eight hundred dollars nor more than one thousand 17 five hundred dollars or by imprisonment for not more than one hundred 18 eighty days or by both such fine and imprisonment. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 20 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07458-01-5